Louisiana, session 2026, HB462.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:773 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§773. Appointment and term of board of commissioners
The management and control of the district shall be vested in a board of
commissioners composed of seven members as follows:
(1) The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development or
his designee.
(2) The president of each parish comprising the district or the president's
designee.
(3) The governor shall appoint one resident of the district as a member who
shall serve at the pleasure of governor.
(4) The speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint at least one
and not more than two representatives whose representative district includes a
portion of at least one of the parishes comprising the district. The speaker shall
appoint, as practicable, one representative from each of the parishes comprising the
district.
(5) The president of the Senate shall appoint at least one and not more than
two senators whose senate district includes a portion of at least one of the parishes
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 462 ENROLLED
comprising the district. The president shall appoint, as practicable, one senator from
each of the parishes comprising the district.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.